es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Juguetes y actividades para bebés > Accesorios móviles para bebés: Brazos móviles; Accesorios móviles; Soportes móviles
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Đồ chơi trẻ em & thiết bị hoạt động > Phụ kiện đồ chơi treo nôi cho bé: Khung treo đồ chơi; Đồ gá đồ chơi; Mâm kẹp đồ chơi
sk-SK: Bábätká > Detské hračky a vybavenie na interaktívne hry > Detské mobilné príslušenstvo: Mobilné kolotoče; Mobilné nadstavce; Mobilné držiaky
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Oyuncakları ve Aktivite Gereçleri > Bebekler için Hareketli Teçhizatlar: Mobil Kollar; Mobil Ekler; Mobil Tutucular
it: Bebè e bimbi > Attrezzature per attività e giochi per bebè > Accessori per giostrine: Per la mobilità delle braccia; Accessori mobili; Supporti mobili
da: Baby og småbørn > Babylegetøj > Babyuroer – tilbehør: Babyuroer – Arme; Babyuroer – Vedhæng; Babyuroer – Holdere
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Jucării pentru copii și echipamente pentru activități > Accesorii carusele pentru copii: Brațe mobile; Accesorii mobile; Suporturi mobile
ko: 영유아 > 아기 장난감/운동용품 > 아기 모빌 부대용품: 모빌 거치대; 모빌 부착물; 모빌 홀더
nl: Baby en peuter > Babyspeelgoed > Accessoires voor babymobielen: Armen voor mobielen; Bevestigingen voor mobielen; Houders voor mobielen
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan lelut ja aktivointi > Mobilen lisätarvikkeet: Mobilen varret; Mobilen lisäosat; Mobilen pidikkeet
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Jouets pour bébés et équipement d’éveil > Accessoires de mobiles pour bébés: Bras de mobiles; Pièces de mobiles; Supports de mobiles
pt-BR: Infantil > Brinquedos para bebês > Acessórios para móbile infantil: Braços de móbile; Acessórios de móbile; Suportes de móbile
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Бебешки играчки и игри за активно развитие > Аксесоари за мобилни играчки: Стойки за мобилни играчки; Приспособления за мобилни играчки; Държачи за мобилни играчки
nb: Baby og barn > Babyleker og aktivitetsutstyr > Mobiltilbehør for baby: Mobilarmer; Mobiltilbehør; Mobilholdere
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Babajátékok és -tevékenységfelszerelések > Babaforgójáték-kiegészítők: Forgójáték-karok; Forgójáték-tartozékok; Forgójáték-tartók
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー向けおもちゃ > ベッドメリー・モビール関連用品: モビールアーム; モビールアタッチメント; モビールホルダー
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dječje igračke i oprema > Dodaci za mobile za bebe: Ručke za mobile; Dodatci za mobile; Držači za mobile
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Zabawki dla niemowląt > Akcesoria do karuzel dla niemowląt: Ramiona karuzeli; Przywieszki do karuzeli; Uchwyty do karuzeli
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Βρεφικά παιχνίδια και εξοπλισμός δραστηριοτήτων > Αξεσουάρ για κρεμαστά παιχνίδια: Βραχίονες για κρεμαστά παιχνίδια; Προσαρτήματα για κρεμαστά παιχνίδια; Βάσεις για κρεμαστά παιχνίδια
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Otroške igrače in oprema za razvoj motoričnih sposobnosti > Dodatki za mobile za dojenčka: Ročaji za mobile; Obeski za mobile; Držala za mobile
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių žaislai ir veiklos įranga > Karuselių kūdikiams priedai: Karuselių skersiniai; Karuselių priedai; Karuselių laikikliai
sv: Baby och småbarn > Bebisleksaker och aktivitetsutrustning > Tillbehör till barnmobiler: Mobilarmar; Mobilextradelar; Mobilhållare
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿玩具/活动设备 > 婴儿床上挂铃配件: 床铃挂件臂; 床铃挂件附件; 床铃挂件支架
ru: Товары для детей > Детские игрушки и товары для активного развития > Аксессуары для детских мобилей: Кронштейны для мобилей; Крепления для мобилей; Держатели для мобилей
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Toys & Activity Equipment > Baby Mobile Accessories: Mobile Arms; Mobile Attachments; Mobile Holders
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์ของเล่นและกิจกรรมสำหรับเด็กทารก > อุปกรณ์โมบายสำหรับทารก: เสาโมบาย; ส่วนเสริมโมบาย; ที่วางโมบาย
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒玩具和嬰兒活動設備 > 嬰兒床邊音樂鈴配件: 移動懸臂; 移動配件; 活動支架
cs: Děti a kojenci > Dětské hračky > Závěsné hračky – příslušenství: Závěsné hračky – ramena; Závěsné hračky – přívěsky; Závěsné hračky – držáky
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Equipamento de atividade e brinquedos para bebé > Acessórios móveis para bebé: Braços móveis; Fixações móveis; Suportes móveis
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babyspielwaren > Baby-Mobile-Zubehör: Mobilearme; Mobileanhänger; Mobilehalter